Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.18.010

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this title.

(1) "Adult basic education" means instruction designed to achieve mastery of skills in reading, writing, oral communication, and computation at a level sufficient to allow the individual to function effectively as a parent, worker, and citizen in the United States, commensurate with that individual's actual ability level, and includes English as a second language and preparation and testing services for a high school equivalency certificate as provided in RCW 28B.50.536.

(2) "Board" means the workforce training and education coordinating board.

(3) "Director" means the director of the workforce training and education coordinating board.

(4) "Industry skill panel" means a regional partnership of business, labor, and education leaders that identifies skill gaps in a key economic cluster and enables the industry and public partners to respond to and be proactive in addressing workforce skill needs.

(5) "Training system" means programs and courses of secondary vocational education, technical college programs and courses, community college vocational programs and courses, private career school and college programs and courses, employer-sponsored training, adult basic education programs and courses, programs and courses funded by the federal workforce innovation and opportunity act, programs and courses funded by the federal vocational act, programs and courses funded under the federal adult education act, publicly funded programs and courses for adult literacy education, and apprenticeships, and programs and courses offered by private and public nonprofit organizations that are representative of communities or significant segments of communities and provide job training or adult literacy services.

(6) "Vocational education" means organized educational programs offering a sequence of courses which are directly related to the preparation or retraining of individuals in paid or unpaid employment in current or emerging occupations requiring other than a baccalaureate or advanced degree. Such programs shall include competency-based applied learning which contributes to an individual's academic knowledge, higher-order reasoning, and problem-solving skills, work attitudes, general employability skills, and the occupational-specific skills necessary for economic independence as a productive and contributing member of society. Such term also includes applied technology education.

(7) "Workforce development council" means a local workforce development board as established in P.L. 113-128 Sec. 107.

(8) "Workforce skills" means skills developed through applied learning that strengthen and reinforce an individual's academic knowledge, critical thinking, problem solving, and work ethic and, thereby, develop the employability, occupational skills, and management of home and work responsibilities necessary for economic independence.

[ 2017 c 39 s 3; 2013 c 39 s 16. Prior: 2009 c 151 s 5; 2008 c 103 s 2; 1996 c 99 s 2; 1991 c 238 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2008 c 103: "(1) The legislature finds that a skilled workforce is essential for employers and job seekers to compete in today's global economy. The engines of economic progress are fueled by education and training. The legislature further finds that industry skill panels are a critical and proven form of public-private partnership that harness the expertise of leaders in business, labor, and education to identify workforce development strategies for industries that drive Washington's regional economies. Industry skill panels foster innovation and enable industry leaders and public partners to be proactive, addressing changing needs for businesses quickly and strategically. Industry skill panels leverage small state investments with private sector investments to ensure that public resources are better aligned with industry needs.

(2) The legislature further finds that industry skill panels support other valuable initiatives such as the department of community, trade, and economic development's cluster-based economic development grants; the community and technical college centers of excellence, high-demand funds, and the job skills program; and the employment security department's incumbent worker training funds. Industry skill panels provide a framework for coordinating these and other investments in line with economic and workforce development strategies identified by industry leaders. It is the intent of the legislature to support the development and maintenance of industry skill panels in key sectors of the economy as an efficient and effective way to support regional economic development." [ 2008 c 103 s 1.]